California statutes. Public Resources Code
(3) Prior to imposing an administrative penalty, and upon the request of the owner or operator of the solid waste facility or owner or operator of the disposal site, meet with the owner or operator to clarify the regulatory requirements and to determine what actions, if any, the owner or operator could voluntarily take to bring the solid waste facility or disposal site into compliance by the earliest feasible date. If a contemporaneous enforcement action or investigation dealing with the same violation or with similar violations is being pursued by another regulatory agency, a city attorney, a county counsel, a district attorney, or the Attorney General, the operator may request a meeting with all those investigating and enforcement entities.

(4) Consider the factors prescribed in Section 45016 in determining appropriate enforcement actions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 500, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

45021.

If any board or agency specified in Section 45019 receives a complaint concerning a solid waste facility or disposal site and the board or agency determines that it is not authorized to take action concerning the complaint, the board or agency shall refer the complaint within 30 days from the date of receipt to another state agency that it determines is authorized to take action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 500, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

45022.

If any agency or board specified in Section 45019 receives a complaint concerning a solid waste facility or disposal site that the agency or board does not refer to another state agency pursuant to Section 45021, or if the agency or board receives this complaint referred to it by another agency or board pursuant to Section 45021, the agency or board shall either take appropriate enforcement action concerning the facility or site pursuant to this part, or refer the complaint to the Attorney General, the district attorney, the city attorney, or the county counsel, whichever is applicable, or, at the earliest feasible date, not to exceed 60 days, provide the person who filed the complaint with a written statement explaining why an enforcement action would not be appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 500, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

45022.5.

An enforcement agency shall maintain a record of, and take any action that the enforcement agency is authorized to take regarding, a complaint, referral, or inspection relating to the operation of a solid waste facility, solid waste disposal site, or solid waste handling activity, including, but not limited to, those activities that do not require a solid waste facilities permit, within its jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 448, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

45023.

A civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) may be imposed upon a person who for each day the violation or operation occurs:

(a) Owns or operates a solid waste facility or disposal site and who intentionally or negligently violates or causes or permits another to violate the terms and conditions of a solid waste facilities permit or a standard, requirement, or order applicable to a solid waste facility or disposal site.

(b) Operates a solid waste facility without a solid waste facilities permit.

(c) With respect only to a solid waste facility or disposal site, intentionally or negligently violates a provision of this division, or a regulation, administrative order, or standard adopted by the board or an enforcement agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 500, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

45024.

Any attorney authorized to act on behalf of the board or a local enforcement agency may petition the superior court to impose, assess, and recover the civil penalties authorized by Section 45023. Any penalties recovered pursuant to this section shall be paid, to the maximum extent allowed by law, to the board or to the local enforcement agency, whichever is represented by the attorney bringing the action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 952, Sec. 34.   Effective October 16, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Criminal Enforcement [45025. - 45025.]

45025.

(a) (1) A violation of Part 4 (commencing with Section 43000) is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) and not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation. Each instance of disposal that violates Section 44000.5 is a separate violation.

(2) In addition to a fine under paragraph (1), a violation punishable under paragraph (1) is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than six months if any of the following circumstances apply to the person convicted of a violation of this section and cause or threaten to cause serious harm to public health or safety or the environment:

(A) The person knowingly makes a false statement in a permit application or other document used for the purpose of compliance with this chapter.

(B) The person knowingly destroys, alters, or conceals any records required to be maintained pursuant to this chapter.

(C) The person withholds information requested by the enforcement agency.

(D) The person is convicted of more than one violation of this division, or is in violation of more than one regulation adopted pursuant to this division or term and condition of a permit.

(E) Upon receipt of an order from the board or a local enforcement agency, the person fails to correct or make reasonable progress toward correcting a violation.

(b) In addition to any fine imposed upon a conviction, the court may require, as a condition of probation and in addition to any other condition of probation, that the person convicted under this section remove, or pay the cost of removing, any solid waste the person unlawfully disposed, caused, or arranged to be disposed, transported, or accepted for disposal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 500, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 6. APPEALS [45030. - 45042.]



  CHAPTER 1. Enforcement Agency Action [45030. - 45032.]

45030.

(a) A party to a hearing held pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 44300) of Part 4 may appeal to the board to review the written decision of the hearing panel or hearing officer or to review the petitioner’s request in the instance of a failure of a hearing panel or hearing officer to render a decision or consider the request for review, or a determination by the governing body not to direct the hearing panel or hearing officer to hold a public hearing, under the following circumstances:

(1) Within 10 days from the date of issuance of a written decision by a hearing panel or hearing officer.

(2) If no decision is issued, within 45 days from the date a request for a hearing was received by the enforcement agency for which there was a failure of a hearing panel or hearing officer to render a decision or consider a petitioner’s request pursuant to Section 44310.

(b) An appellant shall commence an appeal to the board by filing a written request for a hearing together with a brief summary statement of the legal and factual basis for the appeal.

(c) Within five days from the date the board receives the request for a hearing, the board shall schedule a hearing on the appeal and notify the appellant and all other parties to the underlying proceeding of the date of the board hearing.

(d) The board shall hear the appeal within 60 days from the date the board received the request for the appeal.

(e) The board shall conduct the hearing on the appeal in accordance with the procedures specified in Article 10 (commencing with Section 11445.10) of Chapter 4.5 of Part 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 448, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

45031.

Within 30 days from the date that an appeal is filed with the board, the board may do any of the following:

(a) Determine not to hear the appeal if the appellant fails to raise substantial issues.

(b) Determine not to hear the appeal if the appellant failed to participate in the administrative hearing before the hearing panel, except that the board shall hear the appeal if the appellant shows good cause for the appellant’s failure to appear.

(c) Determine to accept the appeal and to decide the matter on the basis of the record before the hearing panel, or based on written arguments submitted by the parties, or both.

(d) Determine to accept the appeal and hold a hearing, within 60 days, unless all parties stipulate to extending the hearing date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 952, Sec. 35.   Effective October 16, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

45032.

(a) In the board’s hearing on the appeal, the evidence before the board shall consist of the record before the hearing panel or hearing officer, relevant facts as to any actions or inactions not subject to review by a hearing panel or hearing officer, the record before the local enforcement agency, written and oral arguments submitted by the parties, and any other relevant evidence that, in the judgment of the board, should be considered to effectuate and implement the policies of this division.

(b) The board may only overturn an enforcement action, and any administrative civil penalty, by a local enforcement agency if it finds, based on substantial evidence, that the action was inconsistent with this division. If the board overturns the decision of the local enforcement agency, the hearing panel, or the hearing officer, or finds that the enforcement agency has failed to act as required, the board may do both of the following:

(1) Direct that the appropriate action be taken by the local enforcement agency.

(2) If the local enforcement agency fails to act by the date specified by the board, take the appropriate action itself.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 448, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Judicial Review [45040. - 45042.]

45040.

(a) Within 30 days from the date of service of a copy of a decision or order issued by the board pursuant to Section 45031 or 45032, any aggrieved party may file with the superior court a petition for a writ of mandate for review thereof.

(b) (1) The filing of a petition for writ of mandate shall not stay any enforcement action taken or the accrual of any penalties assessed, pursuant to this part or Part 5 (commencing with Section 45000).

(2) Paragraph (1) shall not prohibit the court from granting any appropriate relief within its jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 500, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

45041.

The evidence before the court shall consist of the records before the hearing panel or hearing officer and the board, if any, including the enforcement agency’s records, and any other relevant evidence that, in the judgment of the court, should be considered to effectuate and implement the policies of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 448, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

45042.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall govern proceedings pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 952, Sec. 35.   Effective October 16, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 7. OTHER PROVISIONS [47000. - 48707.]



  CHAPTER 1. Household Hazardous Substance Information and Collection [47000. - 47550.]



  ARTICLE 1. Legislative Findings and Definitions [47000. - 47004.]

47000.

The Legislature finds and declares that, because hazardous substances are an integral part of daily life, it would benefit the public to have access to practical and consistent information concerning chemicals in daily life, products which contain hazardous substances, and proper procedures for the disposal of hazardous substances. This information would improve the ability of all Californians to assist in protecting the state’s natural resources from environmental degradation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 35, Sec. 44.   Effective March 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

47001.

The Legislature also finds that the disposal of hazardous substances by households can be injurious to sanitation workers, the general public, and wildlife and domestic animals, and can pose a threat to the environment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 35, Sec. 46.   Effective March 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

47002.

The Legislature further finds and declares that each household in the state should have reasonable access to legal, convenient, and environmentally safe methods for the disposal of hazardous substances commonly found in and around homes.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 35, Sec. 48.   Effective March 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

47003.

The Legislature, therefore, declares that the state should assist the efforts of local governments and other agencies to provide safer disposal methods for household hazardous waste and to provide public information on the proper disposal of hazardous substances commonly found in and around homes.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 35, Sec. 50.   Effective March 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

47004.

For purposes of this chapter, “hazardous waste” has the same meaning as defined in Section 25117 of the Health and Safety Code, and “hazardous substance” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 78075 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 258, Sec. 120.   (AB 2327)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 130 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 258.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Public Information Program [47050. - 47052.]

47050.

The board shall, in consultation with the Department of Toxic Substances Control, develop and implement a public information program to provide uniform and consistent information on the proper disposal of hazardous substances found in and around homes. The program may include information, consistent with product labeling, on the proper use and storage of products which contain hazardous substances and on safer substitutes for products which contain hazardous substances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1346, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

47051.

The public information program shall be designed to provide uniform responses to public inquiries about household hazardous substances, and to assist the efforts of counties required to provide household hazardous waste collection, recycling, and disposal programs pursuant to Sections 47100 and 47101, and local agencies authorized to provide these programs.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 35, Sec. 55.   Effective March 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

47052.

The public information program shall include the development of pamphlets or other written materials which could be used by local agencies in conjunction with household hazardous waste collection or other programs which these agencies may or are required to offer. The written materials shall be prepared with the intent of promoting consistency in how these local programs define and handle household hazardous wastes.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 35, Sec. 57.   Effective March 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Household Hazardous Waste Management [47100. - 47109.]

47100.

After a countywide integrated waste management plan has been revised pursuant to Section 41770, and the revision has been approved pursuant to Sections 41760 and 41800, the county shall implement that portion of the household hazardous waste collection, recycling, and disposal program identified in the plan which serves the population of the unincorporated area of the county, and the cities or other appropriate local agencies within the county shall implement, for their respective jurisdictions, that portion of the household hazardous waste collection, recycling, and disposal program identified in the plan which serves the population of the incorporated area of the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1346, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

47101.

Section 47100 does not prohibit a city or county from jointly implementing the household hazardous waste collection, recycling, and disposal program, or another local agency from implementing the program in the county pursuant to the mutual agreement of the local agencies involved in implementing the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 35, Sec. 61.   Effective March 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

47102.

The board shall designate a household hazardous waste coordinator to advise and assist local governments and other agencies which offer programs for household hazardous waste management.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 47100 by Stats. 1990, Ch. 35, Sec. 58.   Effective March 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

47103.

The board shall provide technical assistance to local governments and other agencies which establish household hazardous waste management programs.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 47101 by Stats. 1990, Ch. 35, Sec. 60.   Effective March 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

47104.

The board shall prepare, in consultation with the Department of Toxic Substances Control, guidelines and a state policy to guide the efforts of local agencies to provide household hazardous waste collection, recycling, and disposal programs pursuant to this article. The guidelines required by this section shall allow adequate flexibility to local agencies in meeting their individual needs, to the extent that the local agency’s program does not conflict with the state policy prepared pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1346, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

47105.

The guidelines required by this article shall include all the following elements:

(a) Development of a model operation plan for community household hazardous waste collection, recycling, and disposal programs required to be identified pursuant to this article. The model operation plan shall include a description of proper procedures for hazardous waste handling, storage, transportation, and personnel training.

(b) The establishment of guidelines on the generic types of household hazardous substances which should be disposed of as hazardous waste, and guidelines on the safe management of hazardous wastes generated by households which may be excluded from household hazardous waste collection programs but which may require some special handling.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 35, Sec. 67.   Effective March 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

47106.

In establishing guidelines on which products should be disposed of as hazardous waste, the board shall consider such factors as toxicity, concentration of toxic ingredients in a product, and other appropriate factors. The board shall also consider the appropriateness of excluding from any listing of household hazardous wastes specific categories of household products, such as products intended for human consumption, personal hygiene products, and other categories of household products intended for general consumer use.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 35, Sec. 69.   Effective March 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

47107.

The guidelines and operation plan prepared pursuant to subdivision (a) shall, upon request, be made available to local agencies and the public. The board shall advise county health offices of the availability of these materials and of the informational materials developed pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 47051).

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 35, Sec. 70.   Effective March 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

47108.

In developing the guidelines required by this article, the board shall, to the extent feasible, consult existing sources of information, including household hazardous waste collection programs which have been operated in the state and in other states, and industry and academia.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 35, Sec. 71.   Effective March 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

47109.

Any city or county may, upon a vote of the governing body of the city or county, authorize an increase in solid waste collection fees to offset the cost to the city or county of establishing, publicizing, and maintaining a household hazardous waste collection, recycling, and disposal program implemented pursuant to this article. Any increase in garbage collection fees authorized by this section shall be set at a level to bring in revenues not higher than is necessary to fund the reasonable cost of the household hazardous waste collection, recycling, and disposal program. Where an appropriately licensed private entity is utilized by a city or county, under a permit or existing franchise, to undertake a household hazardous waste collection, recycling, and disposal program, the costs of handling, hauling, and disposing of household hazardous wastes shall be paid through fees or rates charged for service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 35, Sec. 72.   Effective March 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.3. Home-Generated Sharps Waste Collection [47115. - 47116.]

47115.

A pharmaceutical manufacturer that sells or distributes a medication in California that is usually intended to be self-injected at home through the use of a hypodermic needle, pen needle, intravenous needle, or any other similar device, shall, on or before July 1, 2010, and annually thereafter, submit to the board, or its successor agency, a plan that describes how the manufacturer supports the safe collection and proper disposal of the waste devices.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 591, Sec. 1.   (SB 486)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

47115.5.

The plan required pursuant to Section 47115 shall include, at a minimum, a description of the actions, if any, taken by the manufacturer to do the following:

(a) Provide for the safe collection and proper disposal of the waste devices.

(b) Educate consumers about safe management and collection opportunities.

(c) Support efforts by retailers, pharmaceutical distributors, manufacturers of injection devices, and other partners, including local governments, health care organizations, public health officers, solid waste service
 providers, and other groups with interest in protecting public health and safety through the safe collection and proper disposal of waste devices.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 591, Sec. 1.   (SB 486)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

47116.

(a) The manufacturer shall post and maintain a copy of the plans required pursuant to Section 47115 on its Internet Web site.

(b) The board, or its successor agency, shall post and maintain copies of the plans submitted by the manufacturers pursuant to Section 47115 on its Internet Web site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 591, Sec. 1.   (SB 486)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Household Hazardous Waste Grants [47200. - 47203.]

47200.

(a) The board shall expend funds from the account, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the making of grants to cities, counties, or other local agencies with responsibility for solid waste management, and for local programs to help prevent the disposal of hazardous wastes at disposal sites, including, but not limited to, programs to expand or initially implement household hazardous waste programs. In making grants pursuant to this section, the board shall give priority to funding programs that provide for the following:

(1) New programs for rural areas, underserved areas, and for small cities.

(2) Expansion of existing programs to provide for the collection of additional waste types, innovative or more cost-effective collection methods, or expanded public education services.

(3) Regional household hazardous waste programs.

(b) (1) The total amount of grants made by the board pursuant to this section shall not exceed, in any one fiscal year, three million dollars ($3,000,000).

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the total amount of grants made by the board pursuant to this section may exceed three million dollars ($3,000,000) but shall not exceed six million dollars ($6,000,000), in any one fiscal year, if sufficient funds are appropriated from the Integrated Waste Management Account for this purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 542, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

47201.

The board shall adopt regulations for implementation of this article, including, but not limited to, criteria for selecting grant recipients.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 656, Sec. 37.   Effective October 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

47202.

All expenses incurred by the board in carrying out this article shall be payable from the account. No liability or obligation is imposed upon the state pursuant to this part, and the board shall not incur any liability or obligation beyond the extent to which money is provided in the account for the purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 656, Sec. 37.   Effective October 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

47203.

Upon appropriation by the Legislature, the board shall allocate, from the account, an amount not to exceed sixty thousand dollars ($60,000), to the Hazardous Waste Control Account, for expenditure for the 1993–94 fiscal year, to the Department of Toxic Substances Control, for the development and maintenance, jointly with the board, of a data base of all household hazardous waste collection events, facilities, and programs within the state. On and after July 1, 1994, upon appropriation by the Legislature, the board shall allocate an amount from the account of not more than sixteen thousand three hundred dollars ($16,300) in each fiscal year for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 656, Sec. 37.   Effective October 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Liability [47550. - 47550.]

47550.

A city, county, or local agency operating a household hazardous waste collection, recycling, and disposal program in accordance with Article 3 (commencing with Section 47100), and in accordance with Article 10.8 (commencing with Section 25218) of Chapter 6.5 of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code, is not liable for any damage or injury caused by an action taken by the city, county, or local agency, or an employee or authorized agency of the city, county, or local agency, in the course of the operation of the program, unless the action is performed in bad faith or in a negligent manner. For purposes of this section, it shall be presumed that the action is performed in good faith and without negligence, and this presumption shall affect the burden of proof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 647, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Finances [47901. - 48028.]



  ARTICLE 1. The Integrated Waste Management Fund [47901. - 47902.]

47901.

(a) All revenues received by the board shall be deposited in the specified account in the fund. Any revenue received by the board for which no account is specified shall be deposited in the Integrated Waste Management Account created by Section 48001 in the fund. The board may establish or modify other subaccounts in the account, as appropriate and necessary for proper administration.

(b) Any funds remaining in the Solid Waste Disposal Site Cleanup and Maintenance Account in the Integrated Waste Management Fund shall be transferred to the Integrated Waste Management Account in the Integrated Waste Management Fund, consistent with Section 16346 of the Government Code.

(c) Any expenditures charged to the Solid Waste Disposal Site Cleanup and Maintenance Account in the fund shall be transferred to the Integrated Waste Management Account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 656, Sec. 38.   Effective October 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

47902.

Notwithstanding Section 16475 of the Government Code, all interest earned and other increment derived from the investment of revenues in an account in the Integrated Waste Management Fund shall be deposited in that account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1293, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Management of the Fund [48000. - 48008.]

48000.

(a) Each operator of a disposal facility shall pay a fee quarterly to the State Board of Equalization, which is based on the amount, by weight or volumetric equivalent, as determined by the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, of all solid waste disposed of at each disposal site.

(b) (1) The fee for solid waste disposed of shall be one dollar and thirty-four cents ($1.34) per ton. Commencing with the 1995–96 fiscal year, the amount of the fee shall be established by the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery at an amount that is sufficient to generate revenues equivalent to the approved budget for that fiscal year, including a prudent reserve, but shall not exceed one dollar and
 forty cents ($1.40) per ton.

(2) On and after July 1, 2012, the amount of the fee established by the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be increased by twelve cents ($0.12) per ton for each operator of a solid waste landfill whose owner has notified the department that it elects to participate in the State Solid Waste Postclosure and Corrective Action Trust Fund pursuant to Article 2.1 (commencing with Section 48010).

(c) The Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery shall notify the state board on the first day of the period in which the rate shall take effect of any rate change adopted pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b).

(d) The Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery and the state board shall ensure that all of the fees for solid waste
 imposed pursuant to this section that are collected at a transfer station are paid to the state board in accordance with this article.

(e) (1) The fee imposed by paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) shall not be operative on or after July 1, 2012, unless the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery receives, on or before January 1, 2012, letters of participation in the State Solid Waste Postclosure and Corrective Action Trust Fund from landfill owners representing at least 50 percent of the total volume of waste disposed of in 2010.

(2) The Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery shall notify the state board, on or before February 29, 2012, if the fee imposed by paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) shall become operative pursuant to paragraph (1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 417, Sec. 1.   (AB 1004)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

48001.

The revenue from the fees paid pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 48000 shall, after payment of refunds and administrative costs of collection, be deposited in the Integrated Waste Management Account, which is hereby created in the fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 318, Sec. 2.   (AB 274)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

48001.5.

(a) The revenue from the fees paid pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 48000 shall, after payment of refunds and administrative costs of collection, be deposited in the State Solid Waste Postclosure and Corrective Action Trust Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury.

(b) Fees, revenues, and all interest earned shall be available to the board, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to carry out the purposes of Article 2.1, including all of the following:

(1) Corrective action and postclosure activities pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 48011.

(2) Administrative costs incurred by the board in implementing Article 2.1.

(3) Any startup costs incurred by the board in implementing Article 2.1 that were incurred before fees were paid pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 48000.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 318, Sec. 3.   (AB 274)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

48002.

The state board shall adopt rules and regulations to carry out Section 48000, including, but not limited to, provisions governing collections, reporting, refunds, and appeals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

48003.

The state board may not spend more than 12 percent of the total revenues deposited, or anticipated to be deposited, in the account during a fiscal year for the administration of this chapter during that fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 742, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

48004.

(a) The money in the account shall be used by the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the following purposes:

(1) The administration and implementation of this division by the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery.

(2) The state water board’s and regional water boards’ administration and implementation of Division 7 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Water Code at solid waste disposal sites.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that an amount that is sufficient to fund state water board
 and regional water board regulatory activities for solid waste landfills be appropriated from the account by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act. Those persons who are required to pay the fee imposed pursuant to Section 48000 shall not be required to pay the annual fee imposed pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 13260 of the Water Code with regard to the same discharge if the requirements for the waiver of that fee set forth in paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 13260 of the Water Code are met.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), if the fee established pursuant to Section 48000 does not generate revenues sufficient to fund the programs specified in this section, or if the amount appropriated by the Legislature for these purposes is reduced, those reductions shall be equally and proportionally distributed between funding for the solid waste programs of the state water board and the regional water boards and the
 Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 718, Sec. 20.   (SB 855)   Effective October 19, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

48005.

Unless otherwise specified, all money received by the board shall be deposited in the Integrated Waste Management Account and shall be used by the board, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purposes for which it was collected or, if not expressly specified for a particular purpose, for the purposes of this division, except Part 6 (commencing with Section 46000), which shall be funded by fees pursuant to Section 46801.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

48006.

The board may exempt from all fees any operator of a solid waste landfill that receives less than a monthly average of five tons per operating day of solid waste.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

48007.

(a) Recycled materials and inert waste removed from the waste stream and not disposed of in a solid waste landfill shall not be included for the purpose of assessing fees imposed pursuant to Section 48000.

(b) For purposes of this section, and only for the purpose of determining whether fees shall be imposed pursuant to Section 48000, “inert waste removed from the waste stream and not disposed of in solid waste landfills” includes the use, disposal, or placement of solely inert waste on property where surface mining operations, as defined in Section 2735, are being conducted, or have been conducted previously, as long as the use, disposal, or placement is for purposes of reclamation, as defined in Section 2733, pursuant to either of the following:

(1) A reclamation plan approved pursuant to Section 2774.

(2) For surface mining operations conducted prior to January 1, 1976, an agreement with a city or county, or a permit issued by a city or county, that provides for a fill appropriately engineered for the planned future use of the reclaimed minesite.

(c) For purposes of this section, “inert waste” means rock, concrete, brick, sand, soil, and cured asphalt only. In addition, inert waste does not include any waste that meets the definition of “designated waste” as defined in Section 13173 of the Water Code or “hazardous waste” as defined by Section 40141.

(d) This section shall remain operative until the operative date of the regulations adopted by the board pursuant to Section 48007.5 and, as of the January 1 following that operative date, this section is repealed, unless a later enacted statute deletes or extends the dates on which it becomes inoperative and is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 600, Sec. 6) by Stats. 2001, Ch. 811, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Inoperative on date prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, by its own provisions.   See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 2 of Ch. 811.)
-------------------------------------------

48007.

(a) Recycled materials and inert waste removed from the waste stream and not disposed of in a solid waste landfill shall not be included for the purpose of assessing fees imposed pursuant to Section 48000.

(b) This section shall become operative on the operative date of the regulations adopted by the board pursuant to Section 48007.5.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 600, Sec. 7) by Stats. 2001, Ch. 811, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Section operative on date prescribed in subd. (b).)
-------------------------------------------

48007.5.

(a) On or before January 1, 2004, the board shall adopt and file with the Secretary of State, pursuant to Section 11346.2 of the Government Code, regulations that establish an appropriate level of oversight of the management of construction and demolition waste, and the management of inert waste at mine reclamation sites.

(b) For purposes of this section, “inert waste” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 48007, as that section read on January 1, 2002.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 811, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

48008.
